New York, session 2025-2026, S293.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The section heading, the opening paragraph of subdivision 1 2 and subdivision 2 of section 811 of the labor law, the section heading 3 and the opening paragraph of subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 482 of 4 the laws of 1961 and subdivision 2 as amended by chapter 51 of the laws 5 of 1968, are amended to read as follows: 6 Powers and duties of [industrial] the commissioner; personnel. 7 The [industrial] commissioner shall have the following powers and 8 duties: 9 2. The [industrial] commissioner shall appoint a person who shall be 10 in charge of apprentice training in the department [of labor], and who 11 shall act as secretary of the state apprenticeship and training council 12 and of state joint apprenticeship committees. The [industrial] commis- 13 sioner is further authorized to appoint such clerical, technical, and 14 professional assistants as shall be necessary to effectuate the purposes 15 of this article. The personnel appointed under this article shall 16 receive an annual compensation to be fixed by the [industrial] commis- 17 sioner within the amount provided by appropriation. 18 § 2. Section 816-b of the labor law, as amended by chapter 669 of the 19 laws of 2023, is amended by adding a new subdivision 3 to read as 20 follows: 21 3. The commissioner shall require that a minimum of ten percent of the 22 labor hours of the total construction workforce employed by all contrac- 23 tors and subcontractors performing work pursuant to a construction 24 contract as defined by paragraph (b) of subdivision one of this section EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01195-01-5 S. 293 2 1 shall be performed by a person or persons participating in a certified 2 apprenticeship program pursuant to this article. Only hours worked by a 3 person or persons in the construction trade for which they are regis- 4 tered as an apprentice, and only hours worked by such apprentice accord- 5 ing to the allowable ratio of apprentice to journey worker as stated 6 under the applicable prevailing wage schedule, may count towards the ten 7 percent labor hour requirement. 8 § 3. Section 816-b of the labor law, as added by chapter 571 of the 9 laws of 2001, is amended by adding a new subdivision 3 to read as 10 follows: 11 3. The commissioner shall require that a minimum of ten percent of the 12 labor hours of the total construction workforce employed by all contrac- 13 tors and subcontractors performing work pursuant to a construction 14 contract as defined by paragraph (b) of subdivision one of this section 15 shall be performed by a person or persons participating in a certified 16 apprenticeship program pursuant to this article. Only hours worked by a 17 person or persons in the construction trade for which they are regis- 18 tered as an apprentice, and only hours worked by such apprentice accord- 19 ing to the allowable ratio of apprentice to journey worker as stated 20 under the applicable prevailing wage schedule, may count towards the ten 21 percent labor hour requirement. 22 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 23 it shall have become a law; provided that the amendments to section 24 816-b of the labor law made by section two of this act shall be subject 25 to the expiration and reversion of such section pursuant to section 1 of 26 chapter 571 of the laws of 2001, as amended, when upon such date the 27 provisions of section three of this act shall take effect.